src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
!! =================================== !
!! The Gothic morphophonological/twolc rules file !
!! =================================== !

Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z æ ø å þ
 á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð ß ç ƕ
 ā ē ī ō ū

 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Æ Ø Å Þ
 Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ä Ë Ö Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ñ Ð Ƕ
 Ā Ē Ī Ō Ū

%^WGStem:0 ! weak grade

 %>:0 ;

Sets

 Vow = a e i o u y æ ø å
       ā ē ī ō ū
       á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý ;
 Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ð þ ƕ ;
 
Rules

"Devoicing d þ and b f"
Cx:Cy <=> Vows _ %^WGStem:0 ;
      	  where Cx in (d b)
	  	Cy in (þ f) matched ;

"Deleting stem-final s in s genitive"
 s:0 <=> Vow s %>: _ ;

!!€ primus%>s
!!€ primus00

!!€grís%>s
!!€grís00

!!$grís%>s
!!$grís0s
